Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1999YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 98 Section 1. Section 321.323A, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 The operator of a motor vehicle approaching a stationary or 3 slow-moving authorized emergency vehicle that is displaying 4 flashing lights, as permitted under section 321.423 , shall 5 approach the authorized emergency vehicle with due caution and 6 shall proceed in one of the following manners, absent any other 7 direction by a peace officer: 8 Sec. 2. Section 321.323A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 9 the following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. For purposes of this section, 11 âslow-movingâ means that a vehicle is being operated at a speed 12 of fifteen miles per hour or less on, along, or adjacent to the 13 roadway by a person in connection with the personâs official 14 job duties. 15